Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9A.42.100 and 2005 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person is guilty of the crime of endangerment with a controlled substance if the person knowingly or intentionally permits a dependent child or dependent adult to be exposed to, ingest, inhale, or have contact with ((methamphetamine or ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or anhydrous ammonia, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, that are being used in the manufacture of methamphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers))any controlled substance classified in Schedules I, II, III, or IV under RCW 69.50.204, 69.50.206, 69.50.208, or 69.50.210, or federal law, unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of his or her professional practice. Endangerment with a controlled substance is a class B felony.(2) For purposes of this section:(a) "Controlled substance" has the same meaning as in RCW 69.50.101.(b) "Practitioner" has the same meaning as in RCW 69.50.101.(c) "Prescription" has the same meaning as in RCW 69.50.101.--- END ---